Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1105.
do enact as follows:AB1105,11Section 1. 106.11 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1105,2,152106.11 Workforce investment programs. The department shall cooperate 3with the federal government in carrying out the purposes of the federal Workforce 4Investment Act of 1998, 29 USC 2801 to 2945. In administering the programs 5authorized by that act the department shall, in cooperation with other state 6agencies and with local workforce development boards established under 29 USC 72832, establish a statewide workforce investment system to meet the employment, 8training, and educational needs of persons in this state. If a local workforce 9development board anticipates that there may be a business closing or mass layoff 10under s. 109.07 or a permanent business closing under s. 109.073 in the area served 11by that board, the board may prepare a list of resources available in that area that 12provide career planning, job search, job skills training, and other support services 13for affected employees, as defined in s. ss. 109.07 (1) (a) and 109.073 (1) (a), 14including contact information for those resources, for distribution to those 15employees under s. ss. 109.07 (1m) (a) and 109.073 (2) (a).AB1105,216Section 2. 109.073 of the statutes is created to read:AB1105,2,1817109.073 Permanent closure of full-service pharmacy or major grocery 18store affecting employees; advance notice required. (1) In this section:AB1105,3,219(a) “Affected employee” means an employee who loses, or who may reasonably 1be expected to lose, his or her employment with an employer that is required to give 2notice under sub. (2) (a) because of the business closing.AB1105,3,43(b) “Business closing” means a permanent closure of a full-service pharmacy 4or major grocery store.AB1105,3,55(c) “Employee benefit plan” means a plan as defined in 29 USC 1002 (3).AB1105,3,86(d) “Employer” means any business entity that operates a full-service 7pharmacy or a major grocery store in this state, irrespective of the number of 8persons the business entity employs.AB1105,3,119(e) “Full-service pharmacy” means a retail pharmacy that dispenses 10prescription medications to the public and employs a pharmacist licensed under ch. 11450 who works on-site.AB1105,3,1312(f) “Highest official” means the mayor of a city, town board chairperson, or 13village president, except as follows:AB1105,3,15141. For a city organized under subch. I of ch. 64, “highest official” means both 15the president of the city council and the city manager.AB1105,3,17162. For a village organized under subch. I of ch. 64, “highest official” means 17both the president of the village board of trustees and the village manager.AB1105,3,2118(g) “Major grocery store” means a store that is licensed under s. 97.30 (2) as a 19retail food establishment, as defined under s. 97.30 (1) (c), that occupies at least 2015,000 square feet and sells a broad line of fresh produce, meats, dairy products, 21and staple foods.AB1105,3,2322(h) “Permanent closure” means a cessation of operations of more than 90 days, 23but excluding temporary closures for public health emergencies or renovations.AB1105,4,1524(2) (a) Notwithstanding s. 109.07, and subject to sub. (6), an employer that 1has decided upon a business closing in this state shall promptly notify the subunit 2of the department that administers s. 106.15, any affected employee, any collective 3bargaining representative of any affected employee, the highest official of any 4municipality in which the affected full-service pharmacy or major grocery store is 5located, and the county board chairperson of the county in which the affected 6pharmacy or grocery store is located in writing of such action no later than 60 days 7prior to the date on which the business closing takes place. The notice to an 8affected employee shall also include contact information for the local workforce 9development board under 29 USC 3122 serving the area in which the full-service 10pharmacy or major grocery store is located and, if available, the list of resources 11prepared under s. 106.11. The employer shall provide in writing all information 12concerning its payroll, affected employees, and the wages and other remuneration 13owed to those employees as the department may require. The department may in 14addition require the employer to submit a plan setting forth the manner in which 15final payment in full shall be made to affected employees.AB1105,4,1916(b) The department shall promptly provide a copy of the notice required under 17par. (a) to the office of the commissioner of insurance and shall cooperate with the 18office of the commissioner of insurance in the performance of its responsibilities 19under s. 601.41 (7).AB1105,4,2220(3) (a) If an employer fails to give timely notice to an affected employee as 21required under sub. (2) (a), the affected employee may recover, as provided under 22sub. (4), all of the following:AB1105,5,2231. Pay, for the days during the recovery period described under par. (b) that 24the employee would have worked if the business closing had not occurred, at the 1employee’s regular rate of pay from the employer at the time of the business closing. 2The employee may not recover more than 60 days’ pay.AB1105,5,632. The value of any benefit that the employee would have received under an 4employee benefit plan during the recovery period described under par. (b), but did 5not receive because of the business closing, including the cost of medical treatment 6incurred that would have been covered under the employee benefit plan.AB1105,5,107(b) The recovery period under par. (a) begins on the day on which the business 8closing occurs. The recovery period equals the number of days in the period 9beginning on the day on which an employer is required to give notice under sub. (2) 10(a) and ending on whichever of the following occurs first:AB1105,5,11111. The day on which the employer actually gave the notice to the employee.AB1105,5,12122. The day on which the business closing or mass layoff occurred.AB1105,5,1913(4) (a) An employee whose employer fails to notify timely the employee under 14sub. (2) (a) may file a claim with the department. If the employee files a claim with 15the department no later than 300 days after the day on which the business closing 16occurred, the department shall, in the manner provided in s. 109.09, investigate the 17claim, determine the number of days that the employer was late in providing notice, 18and, on behalf of the employee, attempt to recover from the employer the payment 19under sub. (3).AB1105,5,2420(b) If the department does not recover payment within 180 days after a claim 21is filed or within 30 days after it notifies the employee of its determination under 22par. (a), whichever is first, the department shall refer the claim to the department 23of justice. The department of justice may bring an action in circuit court on behalf 24of the employee to recover the payment under sub. (3).AB1105,6,51(c) If the department of justice does not bring an action under par. (b) within 2120 days after the claim is referred to it, the employee may bring an action in circuit 3court to recover the payment under sub. (3). If the employee prevails in the action, 4he or she shall also recover costs under ch. 814 and, notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), 5reasonable attorney fees.AB1105,6,86(d) An action under this section shall be begun within one year after the 7department refers the claim to the department of justice under par. (b), or be 8barred.AB1105,6,169(5) (a) If an employer fails to give timely notice to the highest official of a 10municipality or to the chairperson of the board of the county as required under sub. 11(2) (a), the employer shall forfeit not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000 for each 12day in the period beginning on the day on which the employer was required to give 13notice to the highest official and chairperson of the county board and ending on the 14earlier of the day on which the employer actually gave notice to the highest official 15and chairperson of the county board or the day on which the business closing or 16mass layoff occurred.AB1105,6,2017(b) In addition to the penalty under par. (a), the employer shall be subject to 18suspension or revocation of any license issued to the employer under ch. 125. The 19department may request that the division of alcohol beverages initiate a proceeding 20under s. 125.12 (4) to suspend or revoke any such license.AB1105,7,221(c) In addition to the penalties under pars. (a) and (b), the employer shall be 22subject to suspension or revocation of a certificate issued under s. 73.03 (50) or a 23sales permit issued under s. 77.52 (7). The department may request that the 24department of revenue revoke or suspend the certificate or permit. The department 1and department of revenue shall enter into a memorandum of understanding under 2this paragraph, and procedures equivalent to those under s. 77.52 (11) shall apply.AB1105,7,83(6) An employer is not liable under this section for a failure to give notice to 4any person under sub. (2) (a), if the department determines that the business 5closing is the result of the relocation of part or all of the full-service pharmacy or 6major grocery store within 2 miles of the location that is being closed and the 7employer offers to transfer all of the affected employees with not more than a 6-8month break in employment.AB1105,7,129(7) Each employer shall post, in one or more conspicuous places where notices 10to employees are customarily posted, a notice in a form approved by the department 11setting forth employees’ rights under this section. Any employer who violates this 12subsection shall forfeit not more than $100.AB1105,7,1413(8) Section 111.322 (2m) applies to discharge and other discriminatory acts 14arising in connection with any proceeding under this section.AB1105,315Section 3. 109.12 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1105,7,1816109.12 (1) (a) Aid the administration of this chapter, including the 17enforcement of ss. 109.07, 109.073, and 109.075 and criteria for exceptions under 18ss. 109.07 (5) and (6) and 109.075 (5) and (6).AB1105,419Section 4. 109.12 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1105,7,2420109.12 (2) Not later than March 1 annually, submit a written report on its 21activities in the preceding calendar year related to the enforcement and 22administration of ss. 109.07, 109.073, and 109.075 to the chief clerk of each house of 23the legislature for distribution under s. 13.172 (3) to the standing committees with 24jurisdiction over labor.AB1105,51Section 5. 109.12 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1105,8,42109.12 (3) Include, in the report required under sub. (2), the number, type and 3disposition of all determinations made by the department under ss. 109.07 (5) and 4(6), 109.073 (6), and 109.075 (5) and (6).AB1105,65Section 6. 111.322 (2m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1105,8,96111.322 (2m) (a) The individual files a complaint or attempts to enforce any 7right under s. 103.02, 103.10, 103.11, 103.13, 103.28, 103.32, 103.34, 103.455, 8104.12, 109.03, 109.07, 109.073, 109.075, 146.997, or 995.55, or ss. 101.58 to 9101.599 or 103.64 to 103.82. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1105 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1105 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1105 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1105 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1105: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting